Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2141.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma
National Guard Career Technology Policy Act of 2025".
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12177 MAH 01/11/25






Req. No. 12177 Page 1